Rhode Island, session 2025, SB181.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 46-23-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 46-23 entitled "Coastal
Resources Management Council" is hereby amended to read as follows:
46-23-4. Officers of the council — Quorum and vote required for action.
The governor shall select from the appointed members a chairperson and vice chairperson.
The council shall thereupon select a secretary from among its membership or staff. The council
may engage staff, including legal counsel, as it deems necessary. A quorum shall consist of six (6)
members of the council. A majority vote of those present shall be required for action, except that a
super majority of three-fifths (3/5) of the duly appointed council is required to override a
recommendation by the coastal resources management council staff.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000148
========